Oklahoma, session 2025, SB958.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 12 O.S. 2021, Section 2503, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2503. A. As used in this section:


1. A “patient” is a person who consults or is examined or


interviewed by a physician or psychotherapist;

Req. No. 871 Page 1


2. A “physician” is a person authorized to practice medicine in


any state or nation, or reasonably believed by the patient to be so


authorized;


3. A “psychotherapist” is:


a. a person authorized to practice medicine in any state


or nation, or reasonably believed by the patient to be


so authorized, while engaged in the diagnosis or


treatment of a mental or emotional condition,


including alcohol or drug addiction, or


b. a person licensed or certified as a psychologist under


the laws of any state or nation, or reasonably


believed by the patient to be so licensed or


certified, while similarly engaged; and


4. A communication is “confidential” if not intended to be


disclosed to third persons, except persons present to further the


interest of the patient in the consultation, examination, or


interview, persons reasonably necessary for the transmission of the


communication, or persons who are participating in the diagnosis and


treatment under the direction of the physician or psychotherapist,


including members of the patient’s family.


B. A patient has a privilege to refuse to disclose and to


prevent any other person from disclosing confidential communications


made for the purpose of diagnosis or treatment of the patient’s


physical, mental, or emotional condition, including alcohol or drug

Req. No. 871 Page 2


addiction, among the patient, the patient’s physician or


psychotherapist, and persons who are participating in the diagnosis


or treatment under the direction of the physician or


psychotherapist, including members of the patient’s family, except


that a minor child under eighteen (18) years of age has no privilege


to refuse to disclose or to prevent any other person from disclosing


such confidential communications to the minor child’s parent or


legal guardian.


C. The privilege may be claimed by the patient, the patient’s


guardian or conservator, or the personal representative of a


deceased patient. The person who was the physician or


psychotherapist at the time of the communication is presumed to have


authority to claim the privilege but only on behalf of the patient.


D. The following shall be exceptions to a claim of privilege:


1. There is no privilege under this section for communications


relevant to an issue in proceedings to hospitalize the patient for


mental illness, if the psychotherapist in the course of diagnosis or


treatment has determined that the patient is in need of


hospitalization;


2. Communications made in the course of a court-ordered


examination of the physical, mental, or emotional condition of a


patient, whether a party or a witness, are not privileged under this


section when they relate to the particular purpose for which the


examination is ordered unless the court orders otherwise;

Req. No. 871 Page 3


3. The privilege under this Code as to a communication relevant


to the physical, mental, or emotional condition of the patient in


any proceeding in which the patient relies upon that condition as an


element of the patient’s claim or defense or, after the patient’s


death, in any proceeding in which any party relies upon the


condition as an element of the party’s claim or defense is qualified


to the extent that an adverse party in the proceeding may obtain


relevant information regarding the condition by statutory discovery;


4. When the patient is an inmate in the custody of the


Department of Corrections or a private prison or facility under


contract with the Department of Corrections, and the release of the


information is necessary:


a. to prevent or lessen a serious and imminent threat to


the health or safety of any person, or


b. for law enforcement authorities to identify or


apprehend an individual where it appears from all the


circumstances that the individual has escaped from a


correctional institution or from lawful custody; or


5. A minor child under eighteen (18) years of age has no


privilege to refuse to disclose or to prevent any other person from


disclosing communications otherwise confidential under this section


to the minor child’s parent or legal guardian; or





Req. No. 871 Page 4


6. The testimonial privilege created pursuant to this section


does not make communications confidential where state and federal


privacy law would otherwise permit disclosure.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2006 of Title 25, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a parent or legal


guardian of a minor child under eighteen (18) years of age has a


right to be present during any meeting or consultation between a


health professional and the parent or legal guardian’s minor child


under eighteen (18) years of age and to be provided, within a


reasonable time and at a reasonable cost, copies of any records of


services provided by a health professional to the parent or legal


guardian’s minor child. Provided, however, that a parent or legal


guardian shall not be entitled to be present during such a meeting


or consultation, or to access such records, when the health


professional has been made aware of an allegation of parental child


abuse, child neglect, or battery.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1910, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1910. A. No person licensed pursuant to the provisions


of the Licensed Professional Counselors Act shall knowingly and


willfully disclose any information the licensee may have acquired


from persons consulting the licensee in his professional capacity as

Req. No. 871 Page 5


a professional counselor or be compelled to disclose such


information except:


1. With the written consent of the client, or, except under the


circumstances described in paragraph 2 of this subsection, if the


client is less than eighteen (18) years of age, with the written


consent of the client’s parent or legal guardian, or in the case of


death or disability of the client, the consent of his personal


representative or other person authorized to sue or the beneficiary


of any insurance policy on his life, health, or physical condition;


2. If the person is a child under the age of eighteen (18)


years and the information acquired by the licensed person indicated


that the child was the victim or subject of a crime, the licensed


person may be required to testify fully in relation thereto upon an


examination, trial or other proceeding in which the commission of


such a crime is a subject of inquiry;


3. If the client waives the privilege by bringing charges


against the licensed person;


4. When failure to disclose such information presents a danger


to the health of any person; or


5. If the licensed professional counselor is a party to a


civil, criminal or disciplinary action arising from such therapy, in


which case any waiver of the privilege accorded by this section


shall be limited to that action.



Req. No. 871 Page 6


B. No information shall be treated as privileged and there


shall be no privileges created by the Licensed Professional


Counselors Act as to any information acquired by the person licensed


pursuant to the Licensed Professional Counselors Act when such


information pertains to criminal acts or violation of any law.


C. The Licensed Professional Counselors Act shall not be


construed to prohibit any licensed person from testifying in court


hearings concerning matters of adoption, child abuse, child neglect,


battery, or matters pertaining to the welfare of children or from


seeking collaboration or consultation with professional colleagues


or administrative superiors on behalf of this client.


SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1939, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1939. A. No person licensed pursuant to the provisions


of the Licensed Behavioral Practitioner Act shall disclose any


information the licensee may have acquired from persons consulting


the licensee in the licensee’s professional capacity as a behavioral


practitioner or be compelled to disclose such information except:


1. With the written consent of the client, or, except under the


circumstances described in paragraph 2 of this subsection, if the


client is less than eighteen (18) years of age, with the written


consent of the client’s parent or legal guardian, or in the case of


death or disability of the client, the consent of the client’s


personal representative or other person authorized to sue or the

Req. No. 871 Page 7


beneficiary of any insurance policy on the client’s life, health, or


physical condition;


2. If the client is a child under the age of eighteen (18)


years and the information acquired by the licensed person indicated


that the child was the victim or subject of a crime, the licensed


person may be required to testify fully in relation thereto upon an


examination, trial, or other proceeding in which the commission of


such a crime is a subject of the inquiry;


3. If the client waives the privilege by bringing charges


against the licensed person;


4. When failure to disclose such information presents a danger


to the health of any person; or


5. If the licensed behavioral practitioner is a party to a


civil, criminal, or disciplinary action arising from such therapy,


in which case any waiver of the privilege accorded by this section


shall be limited to that action.


B. No information shall be treated as privileged and there


shall be no privileges created by the Licensed Behavioral


Practitioner Act as to any information acquired by the person


licensed pursuant to the Licensed Behavioral Practitioner Act when


such information pertains to criminal acts or violation of any law.


C. The Licensed Behavioral Practitioner Act shall not be


construed to prohibit any licensed person from testifying in court


hearings concerning matters of adoption, child abuse, child neglect,

Req. No. 871 Page 8


battery, or matters pertaining to the welfare of children or from


seeking collaboration or consultation with professional colleagues


or administrative superiors on behalf of this client.


SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2602, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2602. A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,


the Except as provided in this section:


1. Health professionals shall not provide services to a minor


without the consent of a parent or legal guardian; and


2. A parent or legal guardian shall have the right to be


present during any meeting or consultation with a health


professional.


B. The following minors may consent to have services provided


by health professionals in the following cases:


1. Any minor who is married, has a dependent child, or is


emancipated;


2. Any minor who is separated from his parents or legal


guardian for whatever reason and is not supported by his parents or


guardian;


3. Any minor who is or has been pregnant, afflicted with any


reportable communicable disease, drug and substance abuse, or


abusive use of alcohol; provided, however, that such self-consent


only applies to the prevention, diagnosis, and treatment of those


conditions specified in this section. Any health professional who

Req. No. 871 Page 9


accepts the responsibility of providing such health services also


assumes the obligation to provide counseling for the minor by a


health professional. If the minor is found not to be pregnant nor


suffering from a communicable disease nor drug or substance abuse


nor abusive use of alcohol, the health professional shall not reveal


any information whatsoever to the spouse, parent or legal guardian,


without the consent of the minor Provided, however, that this


section shall not be construed to authorize any health professional


to provide any abortion-related services to a minor, including


counseling or referrals to another health professional for the


purpose of procuring an abortion;


4. 3. Any minor parent as to his or her child;


5. 4. Any spouse of a minor when the minor is unable to give


consent by reason of physical or mental incapacity;


6. 5. Any minor who by reason of physical or mental capacity


cannot give consent and has no known relatives or legal guardian


guardian who is known or discoverable by the health professional


through reasonably diligent inquiry, if two physicians agree on the


health service to be given;


7. 6. Any minor in need of emergency services for conditions


which will endanger his health or life involve a substantial risk of


permanent damage to his or her physical health or death if delay


would result by obtaining consent from his or her spouse, parent, or


legal guardian; provided, however, that the prescribing of any

Req. No. 871 Page 10


medicine or device or referral to another health professional for


the prevention or termination of pregnancy shall not be considered


such an emergency service; or


8. 7. Any minor who is the victim of sexual assault; provided,


however, that such self-consent only applies to a forensic medical


examination by a qualified licensed health care professional.


C. If any minor falsely represents facts that he may would


authorize him or her to give consent under subsection B of this


section and a health professional provides health services in


reasonable good faith based upon that misrepresentation, the minor


shall receive full services without the consent of the minor’s


parent or legal guardian and the health professional shall incur no


liability except for negligence or, intentional harm. Consent of


the minor shall not be subject to later disaffirmance or revocation


because of his minority, or acts inconsistent with the requirements


of this section.


B. D. The health professional shall be required to make a


reasonable attempt to inform the spouse, parent, or legal guardian


of the minor of any treatment needed or provided under paragraph 7


of subsection A of this section. In all other instances in which a


minor may consent to services under this section, the health


professional may, but shall not be required to, inform the spouse,


parent, or legal guardian of the minor of any treatment needed or


provided. The judgment of the health professional as to

Req. No. 871 Page 11


notification shall be final, and his or her disclosure shall not


constitute libel, slander, the breach of the right of privacy, the


breach of the rule of privileged communication, or result in any


other breach that would incur liability.


E. Information about the minor obtained through care by a


health professional under the provisions of this act Section 2601 et


seq. of this title shall not be disseminated to any health


professional, school, law enforcement agency or official, court


authority, non-judicial government agency, or official employer,


without the consent of the minor, except through court order or


specific legal requirements or if the giving of the information is


necessary to the health of the minor and public. Statistical


reporting may be done when the minor’s identity is kept


confidential.


F. The health professional shall not incur criminal liability


for action under the provisions of this act Section 2601 et seq. of


this title except for negligence or intentional harm.


SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 18m-3 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Whenever the Attorney General has received a complaint from


a parent claiming a violation of Section 1, 2, 3, 4, or 5 of this


act, the Attorney General may, at the Attorney General’s discretion,


bring suit for any violation of this act.

Req. No. 871 Page 12


B. An action under this section may be brought, and relief may


be granted, without regard to whether the person bringing the action


has sought or exhausted available administrative remedies.


C. Any person who successfully asserts a claim or defense under


this section may recover declaratory relief, injunctive relief,


nominal damages, compensatory damages, reasonable attorney fees and


costs, and any other appropriate relief.


D. Sovereign, governmental, and qualified immunities to suit


and from liability are waived and abolished to the extent of


liability created by this section.


SECTION 7. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-871 DC 1/19/2025 5:46:43 AM























Req. No. 871 Page 13